Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.050

Licensing fees—Penalties for late renewal—Reinstatement—Duplicates.

(1) The director shall issue the appropriate license to any applicant who meets the requirements as outlined in this chapter. The director has the authority to set appropriate licensing fees for body art, body piercing, and tattooing shops and businesses and body art, body piercing, and tattooing individual practitioners. Licensing fees for individual practitioners must be set in an amount less than licensing fees for shops and businesses.

(2) Failure to renew a license by its expiration date subjects the holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's renewal fee, at the current rate.

(3) A person whose license has not been renewed within one year after its expiration date must have his or her license canceled and must be required to submit an application, pay the license fee, meet current licensing requirements, and pass any applicable examination or examinations, in addition to the other requirements of this chapter, before the license may be reinstated.

(4) Nothing in this section authorizes a person whose license has expired to engage in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.300.030 until the license is renewed or reinstated.

(5) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established by rule by the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license to an applicant.

[ 2009 c 412 s 6.]